Nevada, session 83, SB198.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 608.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.020 1. Whenever an employer discharges an employee,
the [wages and compensation] :
(a) Wages earned and unpaid at the time of such discharge shall
become due and payable immediately.
(b) Compensation earned and unpaid at the time of such
discharge must be paid in the same manner and on the same day
on which the employee would have regularly been paid the
compensation.
2. Whenever an employer places an employee on a nonworking
status, the wages earned and unpaid at the time the employee is
placed on nonworking status are due and payable immediately.
3. As used in this section [, “nonworking] :
(a) “Compensation” means any bonus, arrangement to share
profits, fringe benefits, matching contribution to a plan authorized
by 26 U.S.C. § 401(k) or other similar contribution that an
employer has agreed to pay to an employee.
(b) “Nonworking status” means the temporary layoff of an
employee by the employer whereby the employee remains
employed and may be called back to work by the employer at a
future date. The term does not include an employee who an
employer:
[(a)] (1) Places on suspension pending an investigation relating
to employment;
[(b)] (2) Places on suspension pursuant to a disciplinary action
relating to employment;
[(c)] (3) Places on-call for available work; or
[(d)] (4) Approves to take a leave of absence.
Sec. 2. NRS 608.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.030 1. Whenever an employee resigns or quits his or her
employment, the [wages and compensation] :
(a) Wages earned and unpaid at the time of the employee’s
resignation or quitting must be paid no later than:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
[1.] (1) The day on which the employee would have regularly
been paid the wages or compensation; or
[2.] (2) Seven days after the employee resigns or quits,
 whichever is earlier.
(b) Compensation earned and unpaid at the time of the
employee’s resignation or quitting must be paid in the same
manner and on the same day on which the employee would have
regularly been paid the compensation.
2. As used in this section, “compensation” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 608.020.
Sec. 3. NRS 608.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.040 1. If an employer fails to pay [:] wages that are
earned and unpaid:
(a) Within 3 days after the wages [or compensation] of a
discharged employee [becomes] become due;
(b) Within 3 days after the wages of an employee placed on
nonworking status pursuant to NRS 608.020 [becomes] become
due; or
(c) On the day the wages [or compensation is] are due to an
employee who resigns or quits,
 the employer shall, in addition to payment of the wages [or
compensation] of the employee [continues] which have become due
pursuant to NRS 608.020 or 608.030, as applicable, pay to the
employee an amount equal to the amount the employee would
receive for 8 hours of work at the [same] rate [from the day the
employee resigned, quit or was discharged or placed on nonworking
status until] of 1 1/2 times his or her hourly wage rate for each day
or portion of a day that the wages due pursuant to NRS 608.020 or
608.030, as applicable, and any additional amount required by this
subsection are not paid or for 30 days, whichever is less.
2. Any employee who secretes or absents himself or herself to
avoid payment of his or her wages [or compensation,] or who
refuses to accept them when fully tendered to him or her [,] is not
entitled to receive the payment thereof for the time he or she
secretes or absents himself or herself to avoid payment [.] or refuses
to accept payment.
3. In addition to the amount required to be paid by subsection
1 and in addition to any compensation which has become due
pursuant to NRS 608.020 or 608.030, as applicable, an employer
who fails to pay the wages earned and unpaid of an employee who
has resigned, quit or been discharged within the time required by
subsection 1 shall pay to the employee an amount that is equal to
the amount of compensation the employee would have earned for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
each day or portion of a day that the wages due pursuant to NRS
608.020 or 608.030, as applicable, and any additional amount
required by subsection 1 are not paid or for 30 days, whichever is
less. The amount must be paid in the same manner and on the
same day on which the employee would have regularly been paid
compensation if the employee had earned compensation during
that period.
4. For the purposes of subsection 1, the hourly wage rate of
an employee must be:
(a) For an employee who is paid wages by the employer at a
rate based on an hour of time, the hourly wage rate of the
employee as of the day on which the employee resigned, quit or
was discharged or placed on nonworking status.
(b) For an employee who is paid wages by the employer by
salary, piece rate or any other wage rate except for a wage rate
based on an hour of time, the amount of wages earned by the
employee in the pay period in which the day the employee
resigned, quit or was discharged or placed on nonworking status
falls, or if the employee has not earned any amount of wages
during that pay period, the immediately preceding pay period,
divided by the number of hours worked by the employee during the
pay period.
5. As used in this section, “compensation” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 608.020.
Secs. 4-7. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)